California, session 20252026, AB1453.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66027.31 is added to the Education Code, to read:66027.31. (a) A campus of the California State University shall, and a campus of the University of California is requested to, provide adoption information to students in each location on campus where contraception and emergency contraception information is available, including when birth control and levonorgestrel are provided to students through the campus’s student health center or pharmacy. (b) The information provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include a comprehensive explanation of adoption and information on the different types of adoption, the rights of a placing birth parent, and specific local adoption resources and support services.